District of Columbia statutes.
22-1406

False personation of police officer.

It shall be a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in the District jail or penitentiary not exceeding 180 days, or by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, for any person, not a member of the police force, to falsely represent himself as being such member, with a fraudulent design.

History

R.S., D.C., § 433
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 114, 41 DCR 2608
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 219 ac, 60 DCR 2064

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-1306.
1973 Ed., § 22-1306.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not exceeding $1,000”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 114 of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 219(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Uniform requirements for security officers amended: Section 2 of D.C. Law 5-180 amended § 4.2 of the Regulation Establishing Standards For Certification And Employment For Security Officers, enacted December 1, 1974 (Reg. 74-31; 17 DCMR 2112.1), to remove the prohibition against security officers wearing uniforms with stripes.

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.